New Jersey, session 222, S771.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 33 of P.L.1980, c.105 (C.54:32B-8.21) is amended to read as follows: 33.  Receipts from sales or rentals of school textbooks [for use by students in a school, college, university, or other educational institution, approved as such by the Department of Education or by the New Jersey Commission on Higher Education, when the educational institution, upon forms and pursuant to regulations prescribed by the director, has declared the books are required for school purposes and the purchaser has supplied the seller with the form at the time of the sale] , whether new or used, in electronic or other form, are exempt from the tax imposed under the Sales and Use Tax Act. (cf: P.L.2005, c.126, s.11) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the first calendar quarter beginning at least 30 days following enactment.